North Dakota, session 69, HB1312.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-09-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
15.1-09-02. School boards - Terms of office.
The term of each elected member of a school board is three years, except when the
member is completing the unexpired term of another. The term of office for a school board
member begins at the annual meeting in JulyDecember following the member's election and
continues until a successor is elected and qualified.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-09-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
15.1-09-08. School district elections - Candidate filings.
An individual seeking election to the board of a school district shall prepare and sign a
document stating the individual's name and the position for which that individual is a candidate.
A candidate shall also file a statement of interests as required by section 16.1-09-02. Whether
or not the election is held in conjunction with a statewide election, allAll statements of interest
must be filed with the school district business manager, or mailed to and in the possession of
Page No. 1 25.0266.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
the business manager, by four p.m. of the sixty-fourth day before the election. A candidate shall
also file a campaign contribution statement as required by section 16.1-08.1-02.3. The business
manager shall forward the name of each candidate and the position for which the individual is a
candidate to the appropriate county auditor for inclusion in the no - party section of the genera l
election ballot.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-09-17 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
15.1-09-17. Notification of elected individuals - Notice to county superintendent of
schools.
Within three days after the canvass by the school boardcounty canvassing board for a
school district election, the business manager of the school district shall provide to each elected
individual written notice of the individual's election and of the duty to take an affirmation or oath
of office. Within ten days after the canvass by the school boardcounty canvassing board, the
business manager shall certify the individuals elected and their terms to the county
superintendent of schools.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-09-22 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
15.1-09-22. School boardsboard elections - Annual elections - Poll books When held -
Applicable procedures.
1. The board of a school district shall hold an election each year between April first and
June thirtiethon the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November to fill all
vacancies, including those caused by the expiration of terms of office.
2. Upon resolution of the school board, theThe annual election maymust be held in
conjunction with the regulargeneral election of a city, as required by state law or by the
home rule powers of the citycounty, provided the cityschool district is located wholly or
partially within the school districtcounty. The school board may agree with the
governing body of the citycounty to share election costs and responsibilities, including
those associated with election personnel, the printing of election materials, the
publishing of legal notices, and the use of poll books.
3. If a school board holds its election in conjunction with a city, references in this chapter
to the date of a school board election mean the date of the applicable city election.
Page No. 2 25.0266.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. If a school board holds its election in conjunction with a city and only one set of poll
books is used, the set must reference the voter's eligibility to vote in the city election,
in the school district election, or both.All procedures governing the general election of
a county shall also apply to a school board election unless specifically provided for
under this chapter.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 15.1-09-30 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Each school board shall hold an initial meeting during the month of JulyDecember
following the annual election. The president of the school board shall select a meeting
date that is convenient to the other board members and shall provide board members
with written notice of the meeting.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-04-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-04-01. Precincts - Duties and responsibilities of the board of county
commissioners or the governing body of the city.
1. The board of county commissioners of each county:
a. Shall divide the county and the school districts within the county into precincts
and establish the precinct boundaries, except that within the boundaries of anyan
incorporated city, the governing body of the city shall divide the city into precincts
and establish their boundaries pursuant to title 40. Any number of townships or
parts of townships may be joined into a single precinct provided that noa precinct
may not encompass more than one legislative district.
b. May alter the number and size of precincts within the county by combining or
dividing precincts. However, the governing body of anyan incorporated city has
the authority to alter the number and size of precincts located within its
boundaries. The board of county commissioners may relinquish the jurisdiction
provided under subdivision a over all or any portion of a township or townships
under its jurisdiction to a city for the purpose of establishing a voting precinct if a
majority of the governing body of the city agrees to assume suchthe jurisdiction.
The governing body of a city, by majority vote, may return jurisdiction granted
Page No. 3 25.0266.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
hereinunder this section to the county and the county shall accept thatthe
jurisdiction.
2. When establishing precincts under subsection 1, a board of county commissioners, in
cooperation with the county auditor, the business manager of a school district, or a city
governing body shall consult with and seek input regarding the size, number, and
proposed boundaries of the precincts from representatives of the political parties
organized within the county. Upon the request of the district chairman of a political
party, a board of county commissioners, in consultation with the county auditor, or the
governing body of a city shall consider proposals to change precinct boundaries.
3. The precincts may not be established later than December thirty-first of the year
immediately preceding an election cycle and not later than seventy days before a
special election.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-07-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-07-04. When ballots furnished proper officials.
1. The county auditor, or any other officer required by law to prepare any general,
special, or primary state election ballots or any county or school board election ballots,
shall prepare, have printed, and deliver to the county auditor at least forty days before
the holding of any general, special, or primary state election a sufficient number of
absent voter ballots for the use of all voters likely to require such ballots for that
election.
2. In city or school elections, the auditor or clerk of the city, the business manager of the
school district, or any other officer required by law to prepare city or school election
ballots shall prepare and have printed and available for distribution to the public at
least forty days before the holding of any city or school election a sufficient number of
absent voter's ballots for the use of all voters likely to require such ballots for that
election.
3. Officers authorized to distribute absent voter's ballots under this chapter shall ensure
all ballots used as absent voter's ballots are secure at all times and accessible only to
those persons under the officer's supervision for distribution. If an election official
personally distributes and collects an absent voter's ballot outside the election official's
Page No. 4 25.0266.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
office, appointed election judges from an election board shall accompany the election
official along with the ballot to and from the voter's location and be present while the
voter is marking the ballot.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-07-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-07-05. Time for applying for ballot - Emergency situations - Sufficient time for
application and ballot return.
1. At any time in an election year, anya qualified elector may apply to the county auditor,
the auditor or clerk of the city, or the business manager of the school district, as the
case may be, by personal delivery, facsimile, electronic mail or otherwise, for an
official ballot to be voted at that election. A voter may obtain an application form
approved by the secretary of state, for an absent voter's ballot for a general, special,
primary, county, city, or school election from the secretary of state, a county or city
auditor, a candidate, a political party, or a political committee. The application form
must provide the applicant the ability to indicate which elections in the calendar year
the applicant wishes to vote by absentee ballot.
2. No auditor or clerk may issue ballots for absentee voters on the day of the election
except to individuals prevented from voting in person on the day of the election due to
an emergency. An individual requesting an absentee ballot on the day of the election
due to an emergency must do so through an agent as set forth in this chapter. An
agent may represent only one individual. The absentee ballot must be returned to the
county auditor's office by four p.m. on the day of the election.
3. A completed application must be submitted to the appropriate election official in a
timely manner so as to allow the applicant to receive, complete, and mail the absent
voter's ballot before the day of the election.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 16.1-07-08 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Upon receipt of an application for an official ballot properly filled out and duly signed,
or as soon after receipt of the application as the official ballot for the precinct in which
the applicant resides has been prepared, the county auditor, or city auditor, or
business manager of the school district, as the case may be, shall send to the absent
Page No. 5 25.0266.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
voter by mail or secure electronic delivery, if the secretary of state determines the
necessary technology is available and according to the choice made by the voter on
the application for the ballot, at the expense of the political subdivision conducting the
election, one official ballot, or personally deliver the ballot to the applicant or the
applicant's agent, which agent may not, at that time, be a candidate for any office to
be voted upon by the absent voter. The agent shall sign the agent's name before
receiving the ballot and deposit with the auditor or business manager of the school
district, as the case may be, authorization in writing from the applicant to receive the
ballot or according to requirements set forth for signature by mark. The auditor or
business manager of the school district, as the case may be, may not provide an
absent voter's ballot to an individual acting as an agent who cannot provide a signed,
written authorization from an applicant. A person may not receive compensation,
including money, goods, or services, for acting as an agent for an elector, and a
person may not act as an agent for more than four electors in any one election. A voter
voting by absentee ballot may not require the political subdivision providing the ballot
to bear the expense of the return postage for an absentee ballot.
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-07-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-07-09. Canvassing of mailed absent voter's ballot received late.
In congressional, state, county, city, or school district elections, if an envelope postmarked
or otherwise officially marked by the United States postal service or other mail delivery system
before the date of election and containing an absent voter's ballot is received by the officer after
election day, the ballot must be tallied by the canvassing board of the county, or the governing
body of the city, or the school board of the school district, as the case may be, at the time the
returns are canvassed. Any envelope without a postmark or other official marking by the United
States postal service or other mail delivery system or with an illegible postmark or other official
marking and containing an absentee voter's ballot must be received by mail by the proper
officer prior to the meeting of the canvassing board. An absent voter may personally deliver the
absent voter's ballot to the appropriate officer's office at any time before five p.m. on the day
before the election. Any envelope containing an absent voter's ballot with a postmark or official
date stamp on the day of election or thereafter may not be tallied with the ballots timely
Page No. 6 25.0266.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
submitted for the election. Before forwarding any ballot to a canvassing board pursuant to this
section, the officer forwarding the ballot shall print the date of receipt on the envelope. Upon
receipt, the canvassing board shall determine that the elector was qualified to vote in that
precinct, that the elector did not previously vote in that precinct on the date of the election, and
that the signatures on the absentee ballot application and the voter's affidavit were signed by
the same individual before allowing the ballot to be tallied.
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-13-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-13-05. Notice of election - Contents - Publication with sample ballot.
1. Notice of all general elections must be published by the county auditor in the official
county newspaper at the same time as, and as a part of, the publication of the sample
ballot preceding the election. The notice must be substantially as follows:
Notice is given that on Tuesday, November ______, ___, at the polling places in the various
precincts in the county of _______________, an election will be held for the election of
state, district, school board, and county officers, which election will be opened at
________ a.m. and will continue open until ________ p.m. of that day with the following
exceptions:
______________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________
Dated ______________, _______
Signed _____________________________________
County Auditor
2. The county auditor shall publish a copy of the sample ballot of the general election
once each week for two consecutive weeks before the election in the official county
newspaper. If noa newspaper is not published in the county, the publication must be in
a newspaper published in an adjoining county in the state. The form of the sample
ballot as ordered and arranged by the county auditor must conform in all respects to
the form prescribed by the secretary of state for the sample general election ballot.
The county auditor shall publish the sample ballot in all forms appropriate for the
method or methods of voting in the county. Candidates from each legislative or school
district within the boundaries of the county must be listed in a separate box or category
Page No. 7 25.0266.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
within the sample ballot by legislative district number or school district name to enable
the voters in each legislative or school district to ascertain the legislative or school
board candidates in their specific district. Sample ballots used for publication purposes
must be arranged using the rotation of the ballot in the precinct in the county that cast
the highest total vote for governor at the last general election at which the office of
governor was filled. The notice must include a statement in substantially the following
format:
The arrangement of candidate names appearing on ballots in your precinct may vary
from the published sample ballots, depending upon the precinct, school district, and
legislative district in which you reside.
SECTION 12. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-15-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-15-29. Determining tie vote in county and school board offices.
If the requisite number of county officers or school board members are not elected because
two or more persons have equal and the highest number of votes for one and the same office, a
recount must be done pursuant toconducted under section 16.1-16-01. If a recount results in a
tie vote, the county auditor shall give notice to the persons to appear at the county auditor's
office at a time appointed by the county auditor. The persons then shall publicly decide by a
drawing of names which of them must be declared elected. The county auditor shall prepare
and deliver to the person elected an election certificate as provided in this chapter.
SECTION 13. AMENDMENT. Section 40-21-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
40-21-02. City elections - When held - Notice - Polls - Agreements with counties -
Judges and inspectors.
Biennial municipal elections must be held on the second Tuesday in June in each
even-numbered year, except an election to elect members of a board of park commissioners
under chapter 40 - 49 must be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November o f
each even - numbered year in conjunction with general election of the county in which the park
district is situated.
1. Thirty days before the filing deadline for candidate names to be printed on the ballot,
an official notice of this deadline along with a list of the offices to appear on the ballot
Page No. 8 25.0266.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
must be published in the official newspaper of the city as provided by section
40-01-09.
2. Ten days' notice of the time and place of the election and of the offices to be filled at
the election must be given by the city auditor by publication in the official newspaper of
the city as provided by section 40-01-09.
3. The governing body of a city shall enter into an agreement with the governing body of
the county or counties in which the city lies concerning the use of a single canvassing
board, the sharing of election personnel, the printing of election materials, the
publishing of legal notices, and the apportioning of election expenses.
4. For city elections that are not held under an agreement with any county, the governing
body of the city shall appoint one inspector and two judges of election for each polling
place in the city at least ten days before the election is held and the polls must be
opened and closed as provided for the opening and closing of polls at statewide
elections. In voting precincts in which over three hundred votes are cast in any
previous election, the governing body may appoint two election clerks for each polling
place. For a city election that is not held under an agreement with any county in a
precinct in which seventy-five or fewer votes were cast in the last city election, the
governing body of the city may appoint one inspector and one judge for each polling
place.
5. When a city enters into an agreement with the county to hold the city election in
conjunction with the county election, the deadline for giving notice of the city election
along with the offices to be filled at the election may be adjusted in order to meet the
publishing requirements of the county. Each city governing body that enters into an
agreement with the county must notify the county auditor, in writing, immediately after
the candidate filing deadline on the sixty-fourth day before the election of the offices to
be filled at the election and any measures to appear on the ballot.
SECTION 14. AMENDMENT. Section 40-49-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
40-49-05. Board of park commissioners in city - Terms.
1. The powers of a park district in a city must be exercised by a board of park
commissioners consisting of five or three members, as determined by the governing
Page No. 9 25.0266.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
body of the city in creating the park district or pursuant to sections 40-49-07.1 and
40-49-07.2. Except as provided in subsection 2, each commissioner shall hold office
for a term of four years and until a successor is elected and qualified. The term of
office of a commissioner begins on the first day of JulyDecember.
2. Members of a newly created five-member board shall hold office as follows:
a. Three members until the first day of JulyDecember after the next regular biennial
city electionelection to elect members of the board of park commissioners under
section 40 - 21 - 02 .
b. Two members until two years from the time mentioned in subdivision a.
3. Members of boards of park commissioners which existed before July 1, 1987, shall
hold office on the staggered basis in effect on June 30, 1986.
4. Members of a newly created three-member board shall hold office as follows:
a. Two members until the first day of JulyDecember after the next regular biennial
city electionelection to elect members of the board of park commissioners under
section 40 - 21 - 02 .
b. One member until the first day of JulyDecember after the next regular biennial
city electionelection to elect members of the board of park commissioners under
section 40 - 21 - 02 .
SECTION 15. AMENDMENT. Section 40-49-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
40-49-07. Election and qualification of members of board of park commissioners.
The members of the board of park commissioners shall possess the qualifications of
electors of the city and must be elected by the qualified electors of the park district. The
members of the first board may be elected at any regular city election or at a special election
called for that purpose by the governing body of the city. Thereafter, members of the board must
be elected at the regular city elections. SuchThe elected members shall qualify by the first day
of JulyDecember following their election by taking and filing with the city auditor the oath
prescribed for civil officers. The election to elect a board of park commissioners may enter into
an agreementmust be held in conjunction with the governing body of the city concerning sharing
of election personnel, printing of election materials, and apportioning of election
expensesgeneral election of the county in which the park district is situated. An election to elect
Page No. 10 25.0266.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
members of a board of park commissioners is subject to the same election procedures applying
to an election for the election of county officers.
SECTION 16. AMENDMENT. Section 40-49-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
40-49-08. Organization of board of park commissioners - City auditor to act as
treasurer of board or board to appoint clerk.
At the first meeting of the board of park commissioners in JulyDecember after the regular
biennial city election to elect members of the board of park commissioners, the members shall
organize the board by selecting a president and a vice president. The city auditor shall be ex
officio treasurer of the park district or the board may appoint a clerk and such other employees
as shall be deemed neededrequired for the efficient conduct of the district's business and shall
fix their compensation. The clerk shall take the oath prescribed for civil officers and shall obtain
suchthe bond as may be required by the board.
SECTION 17. REPEAL. Sections 15.1-09-09, 15.1-09-10, 15.1-09-11, 15.1-09-12,
15.1-09-13, 15.1-09-14, 15.1-09-15, 15.1-09-16, 15.1-09-18, 15.1-09-19, 15.1-09-20,
15.1-09-21, 15.1-09-22, and 15.1-09-24 of the North Dakota Century Code are repealed.
Page No. 11 25.0266.01000